New York, session 2025-2026, S7784.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. For the purposes of this section, "disabled veteran" shall 2 mean a veteran who is certified by the United States veterans' adminis- 3 tration or a military department as entitled to receive disability 4 payments upon the certification of such veterans' administration or a 5 military department for a disability incurred by the veteran in the 6 course of their service. 7 § 2. The state university of New York's board of trustees and the city 8 university of New York's board of trustees shall each adopt a policy 9 requiring all state university of New York, city university of New York, 10 college, and community college campuses that offer membership programs 11 to the general public for the use of fitness and aquatic facilities, to 12 permit disabled veterans to obtain a membership for the use of fitness 13 and aquatic facilities upon the same terms and conditions as apply to 14 the general public, but without payment of any fees or other charges, or 15 at a discounted rate. Such membership shall be granted upon the presen- 16 tation of documentation confirming disabled veteran status at the time 17 of application or any time after such membership has been granted. 18 § 3. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 19 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03049-03-5